Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.097

Homicide investigative tracking system—Purpose limited.

The homicide investigative tracking system and the supervision management and recidivist tracking system are tools for the administration of criminal justice and these systems may not be used for any other purpose.

[ 1998 c 223 s 3.]

NOTES:

Finding—1998 c 223: See note following RCW 43.10.095.